Hawaii statutes.
[§431:31-103] Requirements for sale of
portable electronics insurance. (a) At every location at which portable
electronics insurance is offered to customers, brochures or other written
materials shall be made available to prospective customers. The brochures or
other written materials shall:

(1) Disclose that portable electronics insurance may
provide a duplication of coverage already provided by a customer's homeowner's
insurance policy, renter's insurance policy, or other source of coverage;

(2) State that enrollment by the customer in a
portable electronics insurance program is not required to purchase or lease
portable electronics or services;

(3) Summarize the material terms of the insurance
coverage, including:

(A) The identity of the insurer;

(B) The identity of the supervising entity;

(C) The amount of any applicable deductible
and how it is to be paid;

(D) The benefits of the coverage; and

(E) The key terms and conditions of coverage,
such as whether portable electronics may be repaired or replaced with a similar
make and model reconditioned, or with non-original manufacturer parts or
equipment;

(4) Summarize the process for filing a claim,
including a description of how to return portable electronics and the maximum
fee applicable if the customer fails to comply with any equipment-return
requirements; and

(5) State that an enrolled customer may cancel
enrollment for coverage under a portable electronics insurance policy at any
time and the person paying the premium shall receive a refund of any applicable
unearned premium.

(b) Portable electronics insurance may be
offered on a month-to-month or other periodic basis as a group or master
commercial inland marine policy issued to a vendor for its enrolled customers.

(c) Eligibility and underwriting standards for
customers electing to enroll in coverage shall be established for each portable
electronics insurance program. [L 2012, c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next